Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5516.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 84.36.010 and 2020 c 272 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) All property belonging exclusively to the United States, the state, or any county or municipal corporation; all property belonging exclusively to any federally recognized Indian tribe, if (a) the tribe is located in the state, and (b) the property is used exclusively for essential government services; all state route number 16 corridor transportation systems and facilities constructed under chapter 47.46 RCW; all property under a financing contract pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW or recorded agreement granting immediate possession and use to the public bodies listed in this section or under an order of immediate possession and use pursuant to RCW 8.04.090; and, except as provided in subsection (2)(a)(ii) of this section, for a period of ((forty))40 years from acquisition, all property of a community center; is exempt from taxation. All property belonging exclusively to a foreign national government is exempt from taxation if that property is used exclusively as an office or residence for a consul or other official representative of the foreign national government, and if the consul or other official representative is a citizen of that foreign nation.(2) For the purposes of this section the following definitions apply unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(a)(i) "Community center" means property, including ((a building or)) buildings, determined to be surplus to the needs of a district by a local school board, and purchased or acquired by a nonprofit organization for the purposes of converting ((them))the property into community facilities for the delivery of nonresidential coordinated services for community members.(ii) For taxes levied for collection in 2026 through 2035, "community center" includes property, including buildings, determined to be surplus to the needs of a university exempt from property taxes under RCW 84.36.050 and purchased or acquired by a nonprofit organization for the purposes of converting the property into community facilities for the delivery of nonresidential coordinated services for community members. Property meeting the definition of "community center" in this subsection (2)(a)(ii) is exempt from taxation for tax years 2026 through 2035.(iii) The community center may make space available to businesses, individuals, or other parties through the loan or rental of space in or on the property.(b) "Essential government services" means services such as tribal administration, public facilities, fire, police, public health, education, sewer, water, environmental and land use, transportation, utility services, and economic development.(c) "Economic development" means commercial activities, including those that facilitate the creation or retention of businesses or jobs, or that improve the standard of living or economic health of tribal communities.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. This act applies to property taxes levied for collection in 2026 through 2035.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. RCW 82.32.808 does not apply to this act.--- END ---